Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. Passenger-only ferry service is the fastest way to get boats on the water and build the capacity necessary to respond to Washington state ferries' service disruptions, which will alleviate the negative impacts that those disruptions and cancellations have on the people of Washington state. Increased passenger-only ferry service will also ensure reliable access to health care, education, and work for communities that are dependent on ferry service.Bolstering passenger-only ferry capacity ahead of the FIFA world cup will help to ensure its success and bridge the gap in ferry capacity before the next Washington state ferries procurement cycle puts boats in the water. This will help tourism-dependent small businesses across the state, while honoring our state's commitment to environmental progress and helping Washingtonians travel and connect without driving. Increased passenger-only ferry service will also support workforce development, by creating a workforce pipeline of hard-working mariners who can upgrade their licenses to take on larger vessels, including Washington state ferries and private sector opportunities.The legislature, therefore, finds that additional passenger-only ferry service is necessary in order to improve the lives of all Washingtonians, while also honoring Washington's maritime heritage and the original mosquito fleet that helped build the Washington we love.The legislature further finds that the protection of the environment, and specifically southern resident orcas, must be considered in the expansion of passenger-only ferry service. In keeping with this, passenger-only ferries should not only follow all applicable existing laws designed to protect southern resident orcas, but also work to adopt best practices and the most effective technologies, such as whale reporting systems, automated ship identification systems, and advanced propulsion systems, in order to minimize impacts to the environment and southern resident orcas.Sec. 2. RCW 36.57A.222 and 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 313 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A governing body of a county under Title 36 RCW, a port district under Title 53 RCW, a public transportation benefit area((, located in a county that only borders the western side of Puget Sound with a population of more than two hundred thousand and contains one or more Washington state ferries terminals))under chapter 36.57A RCW, a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721, a county transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, or a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112 RCW, that borders Puget Sound or Grays Harbor, may establish one or more passenger-only ferry service districts within all or a portion of the boundaries of the ((public transportation benefit area))entity establishing the passenger-only ferry service district. A passenger-only ferry service district may include all or a portion of a city or town as long as all or a portion of the city or town boundaries are within the boundaries of the establishing ((public transportation benefit area))entity. The members of the ((public transportation benefit area)) governing body of the entity proposing to establish the passenger-only ferry service district, acting ex officio and independently, constitutes the governing body of the passenger-only ferry service district.(2) A passenger-only ferry service district may establish, finance, and provide passenger-only ferry service, and associated services to support and augment passenger-only ferry service operation, within its boundaries in the same manner as authorized for ((public transportation benefit areas under this chapter))the entity establishing the district.(3) A passenger-only ferry service district constitutes a body corporate and possesses all the usual powers of a corporation for public purposes as well as all other powers that may be conferred by statute including, but not limited to, the authority to hire employees, staff, and services, to enter into contracts, to acquire, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, and to sue and be sued. Public works contract limits applicable to the ((public transportation benefit area))entity that established the passenger-only ferry service district apply to the district. For purposes of this section, "passenger-only ferry service district" means a quasi-municipal corporation and independent taxing authority within the meaning of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution, and a taxing district within the meaning of Article VII, section 2 of the state Constitution, created by the ((legislative))governing body of a county under Title 36 RCW, a port district under Title 53 RCW, a public transportation benefit area under chapter 36.57A RCW, a city transit system under RCW 35.58.2721, a county transportation authority under chapter 36.57 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation transit system under chapter 36.56 RCW, an unincorporated transportation benefit area under RCW 36.57.100, or a regional transit authority under chapter 81.112 RCW.(4) Before a passenger-only ferry service district may provide passenger-only ferry service, it must develop a passenger-only ferry investment plan, including elements: To operate or contract for the operation of passenger-only ferry services; to purchase, lease, or rent ferry vessels and dock facilities for the provision of transit service; and to identify other activities necessary to implement the plan. The plan must set forth terminal locations to be served, projected costs of providing services, and revenues to be generated from tolls, locally collected tax revenues, and other revenue sources. The plan must ensure that services provided under the plan are for the benefit of the residents of the passenger-only ferry service district. The passenger-only ferry service district may use any of its powers to carry out this purpose, unless otherwise prohibited by law. In addition, the passenger-only ferry service district may enter into: Contracts and agreements to operate passenger-only ferry service; public-private partnerships; and design-build, general contractor/construction management, or other alternative procurement processes substantially consistent with chapter 39.10 RCW.(5) A passenger-only ferry service district may be dissolved by a majority vote of the governing body when all obligations under any general obligation bonds issued by the passenger-only ferry service district have been discharged and any other contractual obligations of the passenger-only ferry service district have either been discharged or assumed by another governmental entity.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act may be known and cited as the mosquito fleet act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---